Delaware, session 153, HB130.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF DELAWARE: Section 1. Amend Chapter 40, Title 14 of the Delaware Code by making deletions as shown by strike through and insertions as shown by underline as follows: Â§ 4020. Bargaining unit information and access. (a) Within 14 calendar days from the date of hire of a bargaining unit employee, a public employer must provide the following contact information of the bargaining unit employee to an exclusive representative in a secure format agreed to by the exclusive representative: name; position; worksite location; employee identification number; home address; home and personal cell phone numbers on file with the public employer; date of hire; and work email address and personal email address on file with the public employer. (b) In January and October of each year, beginning in January 2026, a public employer must provide to an exclusive representative in a secure format agreed to by the exclusive representative the following information for all bargaining unit employees: name; position; worksite location; employee identification number; home address; home and personal cell phone numbers on file with the public employer; date of hire; and work email address and personal email address on file with the public employer. (c) A public employer must allow an exclusive representative to communicate with bargaining unit members using the members' employer-issued email addresses regarding collective bargaining, the administration of collective bargaining agreements, the investigation of grievances, other workplace-related complaints and issues, and internal matters involving the governance or business of the exclusive representative, consistent with the employer's generally applicable technology use policies. (d) A public employer must allow an exclusive representative to meet with bargaining unit members in facilities owned or leased by the public employer regarding collective bargaining, the administration of collective bargaining agreements, grievances and other workplace-related complaints and issues, and internal matters involving the governance or business of the exclusive representative, provided the use does not interfere with governmental operations. Meetings conducted in government buildings pursuant to this subsection must not be for the purpose of supporting or opposing any candidate for partisan political office or for the purpose of distributing literature or information regarding partisan elections. An exclusive representative conducting a meeting in a government building or other government facility pursuant to this subsection may be charged for maintenance, security, and other costs related to the use of the government building or facility that would not otherwise be incurred by the government entity. Section 2. Amend Chapter 13, Title 19 of the Delaware Code by making deletions as shown by strike through and insertions as shown by underline as follows: Â§ 1320. Bargaining unit information and access. (a) Within 14 calendar days from the date of hire of a bargaining unit employee, a public employer must provide the following contact information of the bargaining unit employee to an exclusive representative in a secure format agreed to by the exclusive representative: name; position; worksite location; employee identification number; home address; home and personal cell phone numbers on file with the public employer; date of hire; and work email address and personal email address on file with the public employer. (b) In January and October of each year, beginning in January 2026, a public employer must provide to an exclusive representative in a secure format agreed to by the exclusive representative the following information for all bargaining unit employees: name; position; worksite location; employee identification number; home address; home and personal cell phone numbers on file with the public employer; date of hire; and work email address and personal email address on file with the public employer. (c) A public employer must allow an exclusive representative to communicate with bargaining unit members using the members' employer-issued email addresses regarding collective bargaining, the administration of collective bargaining agreements, the investigation of grievances, other workplace-related complaints and issues, and internal matters involving the governance or business of the exclusive representative, consistent with the employer's generally applicable technology use policies. (d) A public employer must allow an exclusive representative to meet with bargaining unit members in facilities owned or leased by the public employer regarding collective bargaining, the administration of collective bargaining agreements, grievances and other workplace-related complaints and issues, and internal matters involving the governance or business of the exclusive representative, provided the use does not interfere with governmental operations. Meetings conducted in government buildings pursuant to this subsection must not be for the purpose of supporting or opposing any candidate for partisan political office or for the purpose of distributing literature or information regarding partisan elections. An exclusive representative conducting a meeting in a government building or other government facility pursuant to this subsection may be charged for maintenance, security, and other costs related to the use of the government building or facility that would not otherwise be incurred by the government entity.